California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) The interregional and unallocated funds provided in subdivision (a) may be expended directly or granted by the department to address multi-regional needs or issues of statewide significance.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75028.

(a) The department shall allocate grants on a competitive basis within each identified hydrologic region or sub-region pursuant to Section 75027. The department may establish standards and procedures for the development and approval of local project selection processes within hydrologic regions and sub-regions identified in Section 75027. The department shall defer to approved local project selection, and review projects only for consistency with the purposes of Section 75026.

(b) If a hydrologic region or sub-region identified in Section 75027 does not have any adopted plan that meets the requirements of Section 75026 at the time of the department’s grant selection process, the funds allocated to that hydrologic region or sub-region shall not be reallocated to another region but will remain unallocated until such time as an adopted plan from the hydrologic region or sub-region is submitted to the department.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75029.

The sum of one hundred thirty million dollars ($130,000,000) shall be available to the department for grants to implement Delta water quality improvement projects that protect drinking water supplies. The department shall require a cost share from local agencies. Eligible projects are:

(a) Projects that reduce or eliminate discharges of salt, dissolved organic carbon, pesticides, pathogens and other pollutants to the San Joaquin River. Not less than forty million ($40,000,000) shall be available to implement projects to reduce or eliminate discharges of subsurface agricultural drain water from the west side of the San Joaquin Valley for the purpose of improving water quality in the San Joaquin River and the Delta.

(b) Projects that reduce or eliminate discharges of bromide, dissolved organic carbon, salt, pesticides and pathogens from discharges to the Sacramento River.

(c) Projects at Franks Tract and other locations in the Delta that will reduce salinity or other pollutants at agricultural and drinking water intakes.

(d) Projects identified in the June 2005 Delta Region Drinking Water Quality Management Plan, with a priority for design and construction of the relocation of drinking water intake facilities for in-delta water users.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75029.5.

The sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available to the state board for grants to public agencies and non-profit organizations for projects that reduce the discharge of pollutants from agricultural operations into surface waters of the state.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Flood Control [75030. - 75034.]

75030.

This chapter is intended to provide the funding needed to address short term flood control needs such as levee inspection and evaluation, floodplain mapping and improving the effectiveness of emergency response, and providing funding for critical immediate flood control needs throughout the state. It is also intended to provide a framework to support long term strategies that will require the establishment of more effective levee maintenance programs, better floodplain management and more balanced allocation of liability and responsibility between the federal, state and local governments.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75031.

The sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be available to the department for the purposes of floodplain mapping, assisting local land-use planning, and to avoid or reduce future flood risks and damages. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to:

(a) Mapping floodplains.

(b) Mapping rural areas with potential for urbanization.

(c) Mapping and identification of flood risk in high density urban areas.

(d) Mapping flood hazard areas.

(e) Updating outdated floodplain maps.

(f) Mapping of riverine floodplains, alluvial fans, and coastal flood hazard areas.

(g) Collecting topographic and hydrographic survey data.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75032.

The sum of two hundred seventy five million dollars ($275,000,000) shall be available to the department for the following flood control projects:

(a) The inspection and evaluation of the integrity and capability of existing flood control project facilities and the development of an economically viable flood control rehabilitation plan.

(b) Improvement, construction, modification, and relocation of flood control levees, weirs, or bypasses including repair of critical bank and levee erosion.

(c) Projects to improve the department’s emergency response capability.

(d) Environmental mitigation and infrastructure relocation costs related to projects under this section.

(e) To the extent feasible, the department shall implement a multi-objective management approach for floodplains that would include, but not be limited to, increased flood protection, ecosystem restoration, and farmland protection.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75032.4.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the funds allocated in Sections 75031 and 75032 are continuously appropriated to the department for the purposes of those sections.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75032.5.

The sum of forty million dollars ($40,000,000) shall be available to the department for Flood Protection Corridor projects that are consistent with Water Code Section 79037.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75033.

The sum of two hundred seventy five million dollars ($275,000,000) shall be available to the department for flood control projects in the Delta designed to increase the department’s ability to respond to levee breaches and to reduce the potential for levee failures. The funds provided by this section shall be available for the following purposes:

(a) Projects to improve emergency response preparedness.

(b) Local assistance under the delta levee maintenance subventions program under Part 9 (commencing with Section 12980) of Division 6 of the Water Code.

(c) Special flood protection projects under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12310) of Part 4.8 of Division 6 of the Water Code, including projects for the acquisition, preservation, protection and restoration of Delta lands for the purpose of flood control and to meet multiple objectives such as drinking water quality ecosystem restoration and water supply reliability.

(d) All projects shall be subject to the provisions of Water Code Section 79050.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75034.

The sum of one hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) shall be available to the department for the purposes of funding the state’s share of the nonfederal costs of flood control and flood prevention projects for which assurances required by the federal government have been provided by a local agency and which have been authorized under the State Water Resources Law of 1945 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of Part 6 of Division 6 of the Water Code), the Flood Control Law of 1946 (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12800) of Part 6 of Division 6 of the Water Code), and the California Watershed Protection and Flood Prevention Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12850) of Part 6 of Division 6 of the Water Code), including the credits and loans to local agencies pursuant to Sections 12585.3 and 12585.4, subdivision (d) of Section 12585.5, and Sections 12866.3 and 12866.4 of the Water Code, and to implement Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 12840) of Part 6 of Division 6 of the Water Code. Projects eligible for funding pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of AB 1147 (Statutes of 2000, Chapter 1071).

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Statewide Water Planning and Design [75041. - 75041.]

75041.

The sum of sixty five million dollars ($65,000,000) shall be available to the department for planning and feasibility studies related to the existing and potential future needs for California’s water supply, conveyance and flood control systems. The studies shall be designed to promote integrated, multi-benefit approaches that maximize the public benefits of the overall system including protection of the public from floods, water supply reliability, water quality, and fish, wildlife and habitat protection and restoration. Projects to be funded include:

(a) Evaluation of climate change impacts on the state’s water supply and flood control systems and the development of system redesign alternatives to improve adaptability and public benefits.

(b) Surface water storage planning and feasibility studies pursuant to the CALFED Bay-Delta Program.

(c) Modeling and feasibility studies to evaluate the potential for improving flood protection and water supply through coordinating groundwater storage and reservoir operations.

(d) Other planning and feasibility studies necessary to improve the integration of flood control and water supply systems.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Protection of Rivers, Lakes and Streams [75050. - 75050.4.]

75050.

The sum of nine hundred twenty eight million dollars ($928,000,000) shall be available for the protection and restoration of rivers, lakes and streams, their watersheds and associated land, water, and other natural resources in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) The sum of one hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Fish and Game, in consultation with the department, for Bay-Delta and coastal fishery restoration projects. Of the funds provided in this section, up to $20,000,000 shall be available for the development of a natural community conservation plan for the CALFED Bay-Delta Program and up to $45,000,000 shall be available for coastal salmon and steelhead fishery restoration projects that support the development and implementation of species recovery plans and strategies for salmonid species listed as threatened or endangered under state or federal law.

(b) The sum of ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) shall be available for projects related to the Colorado River in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) Not more than $36,000,000 shall be available to the department for water conservation projects that implement the Allocation Agreement as defined in the Quantification Settlement Agreement.

(2) Not more than $7,000,000 shall be available to the Department of Fish and Game for projects to implement the Lower Colorado River Multi-Species Habitat Conservation Plan.

(3) $47,000,000 shall be available for deposit into the Salton Sea Restoration Fund.

(c) The sum of fifty four million dollars ($54,000,000) shall be available to the department for development, rehabilitation, acquisition, and restoration costs related to providing public access to recreation and fish and wildlife resources in connection with state water project obligations pursuant to Water Code Section 11912.

(d) The sum of seventy two million dollars ($72,000,000) shall be available to the secretary for projects in accordance with the California River Parkways Act of 2004 Chapter 3.8 (commencing with Section 5750) of Division 5. Up to $10,000,000 may be transferred to the Department of Conservation for the Watershed Coordinator Grant Program.

(e) The sum of eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000) shall be available to the department for the Urban Streams Restoration Program pursuant to Water Code Section 7048.

(f) The sum of thirty six million dollars ($36,000,000) shall be available for river parkway projects to the San Joaquin River Conservancy.

(g) The sum of seventy two million dollars ($72,000,000) shall be available for projects within the watersheds of the Los Angeles and San Gabriel Rivers according to the following schedule:

(1) $36,000,000 to the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy pursuant to Division 22.8 (commencing with Section 32600).

(2) $36,000,000 to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for implementation of watershed protection activities throughout the watershed of the Upper Los Angeles River pursuant to Section 79508 of the Water Code.

(h) The sum of thirty six million dollars ($36,000,000) shall be available for the Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy.

(i) The sum of forty five million dollars ($45,000,000) shall be available for projects to expand and improve the Santa Ana River Parkway. Project funding shall be appropriated to the State Coastal Conservancy for projects developed in consultation with local government agencies participating in the development of the Santa Ana River Parkway. Of the amount provided in this paragraph the sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be equally divided between projects in Orange, San Bernardino and Riverside Counties.

(j) The sum of fifty four million dollars ($54,000,000) shall be available for the Sierra Nevada Conservancy.

(k) The sum of thirty six million dollars ($36,000,000) shall be available for the California Tahoe Conservancy.

(l) The sum of forty five million dollars ($45,000,000) shall be available to the California Conservation Corps for resource conservation and restoration projects and for facilities acquisition, development, restoration, and rehabilitation and for grants and state administrative costs, in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) The sum of twenty five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available for projects to improve public safety and improve and restore watersheds including regional and community fuel load reduction projects on public lands, and stream and river restoration projects. Not less than 50% of these funds shall be in the form of grants to local conservation corps.

(2) The sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be available for grants to local conservation corps for acquisition and development of facilities to support local conservation corps programs, and for local resource conservation activities.

(m) The sum of ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) to the state board for matching grants to local public agencies for the reduction and prevention of stormwater contamination of rivers, lakes, and streams. The Legislature may enact legislation to implement this subdivision.

(n) The sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be available to the secretary for the purpose of implementing a court settlement to restore flows and naturally-reproducing and self-sustaining populations of salmon to the San Joaquin River between Friant Dam and the Merced River. These funds shall be available for channel and structural improvements, and related research pursuant to the court settlement. The secretary is authorized to enter into a cost-sharing agreement with the United States Secretary of the Interior and other parties, as necessary, to implement this provision.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75050.2.

(a) The state board shall develop project selection and evaluation guidelines for the allocation of funds made available pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 75050. Upon appropriation, the funds shall be available for matching grants to local public agencies, not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) per project, for projects to achieve any of the following purposes in accordance with the requirements of that subdivision:

(1) Complying with total maximum daily load requirements established pursuant to Section 303(d) of the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1313(d)) and this division where pollutant loads have been allocated to stormwater, including, but not limited to, metals, pathogens, and trash pollutants.

 (2) Assistance in implementing low-impact development and other onsite and regional practices, on public and private lands, that seek to maintain predevelopment hydrology for existing and new development and redevelopment projects. Projects funded pursuant to this paragraph shall be designed to infiltrate, filter, store, evaporate, or retain runoff in close proximity to the source of water.

(3) Implementing treatment and source control practices to meet design and performance standard requirements for new development.

(4) Treating and recycling stormwater discharge.

(5) Implementing improvements to combined municipal sewer and stormwater systems.

(6) Implementing best management practices, and other measures, required by municipal stormwater permits issued by a California regional water quality control board or the state board.

(7) Assessing project effectiveness, including, but not limited to, monitoring receiving water quality, determining pollutant load reductions, and assessing improvements in stormwater discharge water quality.

(b) (1) For the purpose of implementing subdivision (a), the state board shall give preference to a project that does one or more of the following:

(A) Supports sustained, long-term water quality improvements.

(B) Is coordinated or consistent with any applicable integrated regional water management plan.

(2) The allocation of funds pursuant to this section shall be consistent with water quality control plans and Section 75072.

(c) The state board shall require grant recipients for projects described in subdivision (a) to assess and report on project effectiveness, which may include monitoring receiving water quality, determining pollutant load reductions, and assessing improvements in stormwater discharge water quality resulting from project implementation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 610, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

75050.4.

The state board and the department shall consult with each other, as necessary, with regard to the development of project selection and evaluation guidelines for the following financial assistance programs that are directed, in whole or in part, for municipal stormwater management, to avoid duplication and maximize water quality benefits:

(a) Section 5096.827.

(b) Subdivision (a) of Section 75026.

(c) Subdivision (m) of Section 75050.

(d) Subdivision (a) of Section 75060.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 610, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Forest and Wildlife Conservation [75055. - 75055.]

75055.

The sum of four hundred fifty million dollars ($450,000,000) shall be available for the protection and conservation of forests and wildlife habitat according to the following schedule:

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the sum of one hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) is continuously appropriated to the board for forest conservation and protection projects. The goal of this grant program is to promote the ecological integrity and economic stability of California’s diverse native forests for all their public benefits through forest conservation, preservation and restoration of productive managed forest lands, forest reserve areas, redwood forests and other forest types, including the conservation of water resources and natural habitats for native fish, wildlife and plants found on these lands.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the sum of one hundred thirty five million dollars ($135,000,000) is hereby continuously appropriated to the board for the development, rehabilitation, restoration, acquisition and protection of habitat that accomplishes one or more of the following objectives:

(A) Promotes the recovery of threatened and endangered species.

(B) Provides corridors linking separate habitat areas to prevent fragmentation.

(C) Protects significant natural landscapes and ecosystems such as old growth redwoods, mixed conifer forests and oak woodlands, riparian and wetland areas, and other significant habitat areas.

(D) Implements the recommendations of California Comprehensive Wildlife Strategy, as submitted October 2005 to the United States Fish and Wildlife Service.

(2) Funds authorized by this subdivision may be used for direct expenditures or for grants and for related state administrative costs, pursuant to the Wildlife Conservation Law of 1947, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code, the Oak Woodland Conservation Act, Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 1360) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code, and the California Rangeland, Grazing Land and Grassland Protection Act, commencing with Section 10330 of Division 10.4. Funds scheduled in this subdivision may be used to prepare management plans for properties acquired by the Wildlife Conservation Board and for the development of scientific data, habitat mapping and other research information necessary to determine the priorities for restoration and acquisition statewide.

(3) Up to twenty five million dollars ($25,000,000) may be granted to the University of California for the Natural Reserve System for matching grants for land acquisition and for the construction and development of facilities that will be used for research and training to improve the management of natural lands and the preservation of California’s wildlife resources.

(c) The sum of ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) shall be available to the board for grants to implement or assist in the establishment of Natural Community Conservation Plans, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code.

(d) The sum of forty five million dollars ($45,000,000) shall be available for the protection of ranches, farms, and oak woodlands according the following schedule:

(1) Grazing land protection pursuant to the California Rangeland, Grazing Land and Grassland Protection Act, commencing with Section 10330 of Division 10.4 ...$15,000,000. 

(2) Oak Woodland Preservation pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 1360) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code ...$15,000,000.

(3) Agricultural land preservation pursuant to the California Farmland Conservancy Program Act of 1995, Article 1 (commencing with Section 10200) of Division 10.2 ...$10,000,000.

(4) To the board for grants to assist farmers in integrating agricultural activities with ecosystem restoration and wildlife protection ...$5,000,000.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Protection of Beaches, Bays and Coastal Waters [75060. - 75060.]

75060.

The sum of five hundred forty million dollars ($540,000,000) shall be available for the protection of beaches, bays and coastal waters and watersheds, including projects to prevent contamination and degradation of coastal waters and watersheds, projects to protect and restore the natural habitat values of coastal waters and lands, and projects and expenditures to promote access to and enjoyment of the coastal resources of the state, in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) The sum of ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) shall be available to the state board for the purpose of matching grants for protecting beaches and coastal waters from pollution and toxic contamination pursuant to the Clean Beaches Program, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30915) of Division 20.4. Not less than $35,000,000 shall be for grants to local public agencies to assist those agencies to comply with the discharge prohibition into Areas of Special Biological Significance contained in the California Ocean Plan. Not less than 20% of the funds allocated by this subdivision shall be available to the Santa Monica Bay Restoration Commission.

(b) The sum of one hundred thirty five million dollars ($135,000,000) shall be available for the State Coastal Conservancy for expenditure pursuant to Division 21.

(c) The sum of one hundred eight million dollars ($108,000,000) shall be available for the San Francisco Bay Area Conservancy Program pursuant to Chapter 4.5 of Division 21. Not less than 20% of the funds allocated by this paragraph shall be expended on projects in watersheds draining directly to the Pacific Ocean.

(d) The sum of forty five million dollars ($45,000,000) for the protection of the Santa Monica Bay and its watersheds shall be available as follows:

(1) To the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy pursuant to Division 23 (commencing with Section 33000) ...$20,000,000.

(2) To the Baldwin Hills Conservancy for the protection of the Ballona Creek/Baldwin Hills watershed ...$10,000,000.

(3) To the Rivers and Mountains Conservancy...$15,000,000.

(e) The sum of forty five million dollars ($45,000,000) for the protection of Monterey Bay and its watersheds shall be available to the State Coastal Conservancy.

(f) The sum of twenty seven million dollars ($27,000,000) for the protection of San Diego Bay and adjacent watersheds shall be available to the State Coastal Conservancy.

(g) The sum of ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) shall be allocated to the California Ocean Protection Trust Fund (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 35650) of Division 26.5) and available for the purposes of projects consistent with Section 35650. Priority projects shall include the development of scientific data needed to adaptively manage the state’s marine resources and reserves, including the development of marine habitat maps, the development and implementation of projects to foster sustainable fisheries using loans and grants, and the development and implementation of projects to conserve marine wildlife.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Parks and Nature Education Facilities [75063. - 75063.]

75063.

The sum of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) shall be available to provide public access to the resources of the State of California, including its rivers, lakes and streams, its beaches, bays and coastal waters, to protect those resources for future generations, and to increase public understanding and knowledge of those resources, in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) The sum of four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Parks and Recreation for development, acquisition, interpretation, restoration and rehabilitation of the state park system and its natural, historical, and visitor serving resources. The Department of Parks and Recreation shall include the following goals in setting spending priorities for the funds appropriated pursuant to this section:

(1) The restoration, rehabilitation and improvement of existing state park system lands and facilities.

(2) The expansion of the state park system to reflect the growing population and shifting population centers and needs of the state.

(3) The protection of representative natural resources based on the criteria and priorities identified in Section 75071.

(b) The sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Parks and Recreation for grants for nature education and research facilities and equipment to non-profit organizations and public institutions, including natural history museums, aquariums, research facilities and botanical gardens. Eligible institutions include those that combine the study of natural science with preservation, demonstration and education programs that serve diverse populations, institutions that provide collections and programs related to the relationship of Native American cultures to the environment, and institutions for marine wildlife conservation research. Grants may be used for buildings, structures and exhibit galleries that present the collections to inspire and educate the public and for marine wildlife conservation research equipment and facilities.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Sustainable Communities and Climate Change Reduction [75065. - 75066.]

75065.

The sum of five hundred eighty million dollars ($580,000,000) shall be available for improving the sustainability and livability of California’s communities through investment in natural resources. The purposes of this chapter include reducing urban communities’ contribution to global warming and increasing their adaptability to climate change while improving the quality of life in those communities. Funds shall be available in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) The sum of ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) shall be available for urban greening projects that reduce energy consumption, conserve water, improve air and water quality, and provide other community benefits. Priority shall be given to projects that provide multiple benefits, use existing public lands, serve communities with the greatest need, and facilitate joint use of public resources and investments including schools. Implementing legislation shall provide for planning grants for urban greening programs. Not less than $20,000,000 shall be available for urban forestry projects pursuant to the California Urban Forestry Act, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4799.06) of Part 2.5 of Division 1.

(b) The sum of four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Parks and Recreation for competitive grants for local and regional parks. Funds provided in this subdivision may be allocated to existing programs or pursuant to legislation enacted to implement this subdivision, subject to the following considerations:

(1) Acquisition and development of new parks and expansion of overused parks that provide park and recreational access to underserved communities shall be given preference.

(2) Creation of parks in neighborhoods where none currently exist shall be given preference.

(3) Outreach and technical assistance shall be provided to underserved communities to encourage full participation in the program or programs.

(4) Preference shall be given to applicants that actively involve community based groups in the selection and planning of projects.

(5) Projects will be designed to provide efficient use of water and other natural resources.

(c) The sum of ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) shall be available for planning grants and planning incentives, including revolving loan programs and other methods to encourage the development of regional and local land use plans that are designed to promote water conservation, reduce automobile use and fuel consumption, encourage greater infill and compact development, protect natural resources and agricultural lands, and revitalize urban and community centers.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75066.

Appropriation of the funds provided in subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 75065 may only be made upon enactment of legislation to implement that subdivision.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Miscellaneous Provisions [75070. - 75079.]

75070.

Every proposed activity or project to be financed pursuant to this division shall be in compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act, Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000).

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75070.4.

Acquisitions of real property pursuant to Chapters 5, 6, 7, 8, and 9 shall be from willing sellers.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75070.5.

Not more than 5% of the funds allocated to any program in this division may be used to pay the costs incurred in the administration of that program.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75071.

In evaluating potential projects that include acquisition or restoration for the purpose of natural resource protection, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the board, and the State Coastal Conservancy shall give priority to projects that demonstrate one or more of the following characteristics:

(a) Landscape/Habitat Linkages: properties that link to, or contribute to linking, existing protected areas with other large blocks of protected habitat. Linkages must serve to connect existing protected areas, facilitate wildlife movement or botanical transfer, and result in sustainable combined acreage.

(b) Watershed Protection: projects that contribute to long-term protection of and improvement to the water and biological quality of the streams, aquifers, and terrestrial resources of priority watersheds of the major biological regions of the state as identified by the Resources Agency.

(c) Properties that support relatively large areas of under-protected major habitat types.

(d) Properties that provide habitat linkages between two or more major biological regions of the state.

(e) Properties for which there is a non-state matching contribution toward the acquisition, restoration, stewardship or management costs. Matching contributions can be either monetary or in the form of services, including volunteer services.

(f) At least fourteen days before approving an acquisition project funded by this division, an agency subject to this section shall submit to the Resources Agency and post on its website an explanation as to whether and how the proposed acquisition meets criteria established in this section.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75071.5.

The Department of Parks and Recreation, the board, and the State Coastal Conservancy shall work with the United States Department of Defense to coordinate the development of buffer areas around military facilities that facilitate the continued operation of those facilities and promote the conservation and recreation goals of the state. To the extent consistent with this division, agencies may provide funding to support projects that meet the purposes of this section.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75072.

Up to 10 percent of funds allocated for each program funded by this division may be used to finance planning and monitoring necessary for the successful design, selection, and implementation of the projects authorized under that program. This provision shall not otherwise restrict funds ordinarily used by an agency for “preliminary plans,” “working drawings,” and “construction” as defined in the Annual Budget Act for a capital outlay project or grant project. Water quality monitoring shall be integrated into the Surface Water Ambient Monitoring Program administered by the state board.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75072.5.

For the purposes of Section 75060(e), “Monterey Bay and its watersheds” shall be considered to be watersheds of those rivers and streams in Santa Cruz and Monterey Counties flowing to the Monterey Bay southward to, and including, the Carmel River watershed.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75072.6.

For purposes of Section 75060(f), “San Diego Bay and adjacent watersheds” includes the coastal and bay watersheds within San Diego County.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75072.7.

For purposes of Section 75060(d), “Santa Monica Bay and watershed” includes the coastal and bay watersheds in Ventura and Los Angeles Counties from Calleguas Creek southward to the San Gabriel River.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75073.

Funds scheduled in Chapter 5, 6, 7 and 8 of this division that are not designated for competitive grant programs may also be used for the purposes of reimbursing the General Fund, pursuant to the Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Act of 2000 (Division 28 (commencing with Section 37000)).

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75074.

In enacting Chapters 5, 6, 7 and 8 of this division it is the intent of the people that when a project or program is funded herein, funds for such program or project may be used to the full extent authorized by the statute governing the program or conservancy receiving such funds.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75075.

The body awarding any contract for a public works project financed in any part from funds made available pursuant to this division shall adopt and enforce, or contract with a third party to enforce, a labor compliance program pursuant to subdivision (b) of Labor Code Section 1771.5 for application to that public works project.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75076.

Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development and adoption of program guidelines and selection criteria adopted pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84.  Pursuant to Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 5, the provisions of Division 43 added by initiative Prop. 84 prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729 (including this amendment).)
-------------------------------------------

75077.

Funds provided pursuant to this division, and any appropriation or transfer of those funds, shall not be deemed to be a transfer of funds for the purposes of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2780) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 84.  Pursuant to Stats. 2008, Ch. 729, Sec. 5, the provisions of Division 43 added by initiative Prop. 84 prevail over any conflicting provision of Ch. 729 (including this amendment).)
-------------------------------------------

75078.

The Secretary shall provide for an independent audit of expenditures pursuant to this division to ensure that all moneys are expended in accordance with the requirements of this division. The secretary shall publish a list of all program and project expenditures pursuant to this division not less than annually, in written form, and shall post an electronic form of the list on the Resources Agency’s Internet Website.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)